Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2693.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6104(e) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6104. Administrative duties of department.* * *(e) Furnishing documents and information.--(1) The department may supply copies of and information concerning registrations, titles and security interests of vehicles and such statistical data as it may deem to be in the public interest.(2) A document provided by an applicant to the department for purposes of proving the applicant's identity, residency in this Commonwealth or presence in the United 123456789101112131415161718 States under Federal law, shall not be subject to inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, and neither the document nor the information contained in the document may be disclosed by the department except:(i) as required under subsection (f);(ii) in response to a subpoena for individual records in a criminal proceeding or court order; or(iii) in response to a law enforcement request to address an exigent circumstance if the law enforcement agency certifies in writing that the exigent circumstance did not permit authorities time to obtain a court order. Immigration enforcement does not constitute an exigent circumstance for purposes of this section.* * *(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Immigration enforcement." An effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of Federal civil immigration law, and an effort to investigate, enforce or assist in the investigation or enforcement of a Federal criminal immigration law that penalizes an individual's presence in, entry, reentry or employment in the United States.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2693PN3760 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425